en: Champaign vinegars, Vinegars from champaign
fr: Vinaigre de Champagne

en: Xeres vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de Xérès, vinaigre de Xéres
hr: Xeres ocat
hu: Xeres ecet
nl: Azijnen uit Xeres

en: Rice wine vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de vins de riz
hr: Rižin vinski ocat
hu: Rizs borecet
nl: Rijstwijnazijnen

en: Umeboshi vinegars
es: Vinagres de umeboshi
fr: Vinaigre d'Umeboshi
hr: Umeboshi ocat
nl: Umeboshi azijnen

en: Ponzu
fr: Ponzu

fr: Vinaigres aromatisés, vinaigre aromatisé
hu: Aromás ecetek, aromás ecet
nl: Kruidenazijnen
pl: Ocet aromatyzowany, ocet aromatyczny

en: Alcohol vinegars, spirit vinegar
bg: Алкохолен оцет
de: Branntweinessig
es: Vinagres de alcohol
fi: viinaetikat
fr: Vinaigres d’alcools
hr: Alkoholni ocat
hu: Alkohol ecet, szeszesecet
nl: Alcoholazijnen
pl: Ocet spirytusowy
zh: 酒醋

en: Tomato vinegars, Tomato vinegar
fr: Vinaigres de tomate, Vinaigre de tomate
hr: Ocat od rajčice
hu: Paradicsomecet, paradicsomecetek
nl: Tomatenazijnen

en: Black vinegars
fr: Vinaigres noirs
hr: Crni ocat
nl: Zwarte azijnen

en: Beer vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de bière

en: Goji vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de goji

en: Pomegranate vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de grenade

en: Jujube vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de jujube

en: Kaki vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de kaki

en: Coconut vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de noix de coco

en: Perry vinegars
fr: Vinaigres de poiré

en: Waffles
bg: Гофрети
de: Waffeln
es: Gofres
fi: Paksuja vohveleita
fr: Gaufres
hr: vafli
it: Waffle
ja: ワッフル
nl: Wafels
pl: Gofry
pt: Gofres
ro: Vafe, Gaufre, Gofre
ru: Вафли

en: Plain waffles
fr: Gaufres nature
hr: Obični mekani vafli u briselskom stilu

en: Liège-style plain waffles
fr: Gaufres de Liège nature, Gaufres liégeoises, gaufres liegeoises, gaufres de Liège, gaufre liégeoise, gaufre de Liège, Gaufre moelleuse nature liégeoise préemballée, Gaufre moelleuse sucrée liégeoise

en: Bruxelles-style plain waffles, Plain Brussels-style soft waffle, Brussels-style soft waffle with sugar
fr: Gaufres de Bruxelles nature, Gaufre moelleuse nature bruxelloise, Gaufre moelleuse sucrée bruxelloise